engine/dictionaries/cs_CZ/cs_CZ.aff
SFX Q Y 186
SFX Q   um          0          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěr]um
SFX Q   rum         r          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rum
SFX Q   rum         er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rum
SFX Q   s           d          is
SFX Q   ba          eb         [čdlstvzž]ba
SFX Q   bo          eb         [čdlstvzž]bo
SFX Q   by          eb         [čdlstvzž]by
SFX Q   ba          eb         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rba
SFX Q   bo          eb         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rbo
SFX Q   by          eb         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rby
SFX Q   ba          b          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rba
SFX Q   bo          b          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rbo
SFX Q   by          b          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rby
SFX Q   ba          b          [^čdlrstvzž]ba
SFX Q   bo          b          [^čdlrstvzž]bo
SFX Q   by          b          [^čdlrstvzž]by
SFX Q   ca          k          [srn]ca
SFX Q   co          k          [srn]co
SFX Q   ca          c          [^srn]ca
SFX Q   co          c          [^srn]co
SFX Q   e           0          e
SFX Q   a           0          [čdďfghjňpřsšťwxzž]a
SFX Q   o           0          [čdďfghjňpřsšťwxzž]o
SFX Q   y           0          [dfhpsz]y
SFX Q   ďka         děk        ďka
SFX Q   ďko         děk        ďko
SFX Q   ďky         děk        ďky
SFX Q   ňka         něk        ňka
SFX Q   ňko         něk        ňko
SFX Q   ňky         něk        ňky
SFX Q   ťka         těk        ťka
SFX Q   ťko         těk        ťko
SFX Q   ťky         těk        ťky
SFX Q   ka          k          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ka
SFX Q   ko          k          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ko
SFX Q   ky          k          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ky
SFX Q   ka          ek         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěďťňk]ka
SFX Q   ka          0          kka
SFX Q   ko          ek         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěďťň]ko
SFX Q   ky          ek         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěďťň]ky
SFX Q   la          l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]la
SFX Q   lo          l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]lo
SFX Q   ly          l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ly
SFX Q   la          el         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]la
SFX Q   lo          el         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]lo
SFX Q   ly          el         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ly
SFX Q   ma          m          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ma
SFX Q   mo          m          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]mo
SFX Q   my          m          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]my
SFX Q   ma          em         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ma
SFX Q   mo          em         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]mo
SFX Q   my          em         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]my
SFX Q   na          en         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]na
SFX Q   no          en         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]no
SFX Q   ny          en         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]ny
SFX Q   na          n          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]na
SFX Q   no          n          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]no
SFX Q   ny          n          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]ny
SFX Q   na          n          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]na
SFX Q   ně          ň          ně
SFX Q   no          n          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]no
SFX Q   ny          n          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ny
SFX Q   na          en         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]na
SFX Q   no          en         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]no
SFX Q   ny          en         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]ny
SFX Q   ra          r          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ra
SFX Q   ro          r          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ro
SFX Q   ry          r          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ry
SFX Q   ra          er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěr]ra
SFX Q   ra          0          rra
SFX Q   ro          er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ro
SFX Q   ry          er         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]ry
SFX Q   ta          t          [^h]ta
SFX Q   to          t          [^h]to
SFX Q   ty          t          [^h]ty
SFX Q   ta          t          [^c]hta
SFX Q   to          t          [^c]hto
SFX Q   ty          t          [^c]hty
SFX Q   ta          t          [^au]chta
SFX Q   to          t          [^au]chto
SFX Q   ty          t          [^au]chty
SFX Q   ta          et         [au]chta
SFX Q   to          et         [au]chto
SFX Q   ty          et         [au]chty
SFX Q   va          ev         [hktz]va
SFX Q   vo          ev         [hktz]vo
SFX Q   vy          ev         [hktz]vy
SFX Q   va          v          [^hktz]va
SFX Q   vo          v          [^hktz]vo
SFX Q   vy          v          [^hktz]vy
SFX Q   ek          ku         ek
SFX Q   ek          kem        ek
SFX Q   ek          ky         ek
SFX Q   ek          ků         ek
SFX Q   ek          kům        ek
SFX Q   ek          cích       ek
SFX Q   ek          kách       ček
SFX Q   el          lu         el
SFX Q   el          le         el
SFX Q   el          lem        el
SFX Q   el          ly         el
SFX Q   el          lů         el
SFX Q   el          lům        el
SFX Q   el          lech       el
SFX Q   něk         ňku        něk
SFX Q   něk         ňkem       něk
SFX Q   něk         ňky        něk
SFX Q   něk         ňků        něk
SFX Q   něk         ňkům       něk
SFX Q   něk         ňcích      něk
SFX Q   em          mu         em
SFX Q   em          me         em
SFX Q   em          mem        em
SFX Q   em          my         em
SFX Q   em          mů         em
SFX Q   em          mům        em
SFX Q   em          mech       em
SFX Q   en          nu         en
SFX Q   en          ne         en
SFX Q   en          nem        en
SFX Q   en          ny         en
SFX Q   en          nů         en
SFX Q   en          nům        en
SFX Q   en          nech       en
SFX Q   et          tu         et
SFX Q   et          te         et
SFX Q   et          tem        et
SFX Q   et          ty         et
SFX Q   et          tů         et
SFX Q   et          tům        et
SFX Q   et          tech       et
SFX Q   ev          vu         ev
SFX Q   ev          ve         ev
SFX Q   ev          vem        ev
SFX Q   ev          vy         ev
SFX Q   ev          vů         ev
SFX Q   ev          vům        ev
SFX Q   ev          vech       ev
SFX Q   es          u          es
SFX Q   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX Q   es          em         es
SFX Q   es          y          es
SFX Q   es          ů          es
SFX Q   es          ům         es
SFX Q   es          ech        [^ghk]es
SFX Q   ges         zích       ges
SFX Q   ches        ších       ches
SFX Q   hes         zích       [^c]hes
SFX Q   kes         cích       kes
SFX Q   os          u          os
SFX Q   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX Q   os          em         os
SFX Q   os          y          os
SFX Q   os          ů          os
SFX Q   os          ům         os
SFX Q   os          ech        [^ghk]os
SFX Q   gos         zích       gos
SFX Q   chos        ších       chos
SFX Q   hos         zích       [^c]hos
SFX Q   kos         cích       kos
SFX Q   us          u          us
SFX Q   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX Q   us          em         us
SFX Q   us          y          us
SFX Q   us          ů          us
SFX Q   us          ům         us
SFX Q   us          ech        [^ghk]us
SFX Q   gus         zích       gus
SFX Q   chus        ších       chus
SFX Q   hus         zích       [^c]hus
SFX Q   kus         cích       kus
SFX Q   smus        zmus       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmu        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zme        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmem       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmy        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmů        ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmům       ismus
SFX Q   smus        zmech      ismus
SFX Q   s           tu         ns
SFX Q   s           te         ns
SFX Q   s           tem        ns
SFX Q   s           ty         ns
SFX Q   s           tů         ns
SFX Q   s           tům        ns
SFX Q   s           tech       ns
